Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-502
Cylinders; filling; requirements.

No cylinder shall be filled or refilled with liquefied petroleum gas, or any other gas or compound, nor shall a cylinder be bought, sold, offered for sale, given, taken, loaned, delivered, or permitted to be delivered or otherwise used, or trafficked in, unless such cylinder meets the requirements of the regulations of the United States Department of Transportation as they exist on September 1, 2001.

Laws 1951, c. 188, § 2, p. 696;

Laws 2001, LB 137, § 2.